Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 18 Vacancies

Cross references. —

For provision concerning filling of vacancies generally, see art. 3, § 51, Wyo. Const.

§ 22-18-101.
When deemed to occur.

A vacancy shall occur in an elective office if during his term the incumbent either:

Dies;

Resigns;

Is determined by a court having jurisdiction to be mentally incompetent;

Is disqualified from holding office for any reason specified by law;

Is convicted of a felony or constituting a breach of his oath of office;

Refuses to take the oath of office or to give or renew an official bond if required by law; or

Has his election voided by court decision.

A vacancy exists in an elective office, if upon expiration of the term for which a person was elected a successor has not been elected and qualified.

A vacancy exists in an elective office and shall be filled in the same manner as it is filled when a vacancy occurs after the term of office has begun if, after a person has been elected to an office at an election, but before the time for the taking of the oath for that office, the person:

Dies; or

Resigns. A person may resign an office before taking the oath for that office and before the term of office begins in the same manner that he may resign after taking the oath of office.

If a person who has died is elected, a vacancy in office shall occur and the office shall be filled in the same manner as it is filled when a vacancy occurs after the term of office has begun.

This section shall not apply to mayors and council members who are subject to the provisions of W.S.

15-1-107

.

In addition to subsections (a) through (c) of this section, a vacancy shall occur:

In the office of a member of the state legislature when the person fails to reside in the legislative district from which he is elected;

In the office of a county assessor, county clerk, county commissioner, county sheriff or county treasurer when the person fails to reside in the county from which he is elected.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-255; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2003, ch. 94, § 1; 2021 ch. 165, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the (f)(i) designation; added (f)(ii); and made related changes.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 165, § 2, provides: "The residency requirements of this act shall apply to elected or appointed county officers whose terms commence on or after the effective date of this act."

Acquiescence constituting vacancy. —

Where governor's appointment to public office was invalid because there was no vacancy, but the old officer acquiesced in governor's appointee occupying his office, the former abandoned and vacated office and new appointee stood in his shoes as hold-over incumbent. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Acceptance of resignation necessary. —

The common-law rule of requiring an acceptance of a resignation by proper authority before it can become effective so as to divest an incumbent of the public office has not been abrogated in this state. State ex rel. Raymond v. Jefferis, 26 Wyo. 115, 178 P. 909,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1919).

Arbitrary declaration of vacancy cannot be made,

and there must in fact be a vacancy before an appointment can be effective. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Evidence of appointment. —

Appointment by the governor of a person to the office of fish commissioner is such an official act as the law requires to be evidenced by a written instrument executed by him. State ex rel. Miller v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 409, 34 P. 1028,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1893).

Death before commencement of term and approval of bond. —

After a person had been elected a justice of the peace and had filed his oath and bond but, before the commencement of the term for which he was elected and before his bond was approved, he died, the person already holding the office was the “incumbent” within the meaning of the section, and the death of the other did not create a vacancy. Ballantyne v. Bower, 17 Wyo. 356, 99 P. 869,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1909).

Legislative intent that undersheriff act only while vacancyexists. —

Statute providing undersheriff becomes sheriff upon vacancy in office of sheriff is read in pari materia with sections giving county commissioners power of appointment upon vacancy, providing that every elective office becomes vacant upon death or resignation, and relating to sheriff's bonds, indicating legislative intent that undersheriff act as sheriff only while vacancy exists. State ex rel. Peterson v. Ellsworth, 59 Wyo. 288, 139 P.2d 744,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1943).

No vacancy during military service. —

A district judge who during his term of office entered the service of the United States as a major in the judge advocate general's department, upon returning to and resuming office of district judge was a de jure and not a de facto judge, where he had not resigned and his office had not been declared vacant and no successor had qualified. State ex rel. Raymond v. Jefferis, 26 Wyo. 115, 178 P. 909,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1919).

Where mode of filling office provided. —

A former statute provided for a state examiner, to be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, who shall hold office for four years, and till his successor is appointed and qualified, and the governor not having appointed, with the consent of the senate, a person to fill the office, at the next meeting of the legislature after a vacancy had been filled by the governor, no vacancy in the office arose, so as to bring into operation art. 4, § 7, Wyo. Const., authorizing the governor to fill a vacancy where no other mode of filling it is provided. State ex rel. Richardson v. Henderson, 4 Wyo. 535, 35 P. 517,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1894).

§ 22-18-102.
Determination of existence.

The officer or governmental body having the power to fill a vacancy in the office shall determine whether a vacancy exists in the office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-256.

§ 22-18-103.
Filling vacancy of congressman; generally.

A vacancy in the office of representative in congress shall be filled for the unexpired term at a special election called for the purpose by the governor, provided the vacancy does not occur within six (6) months of the next general election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-257.

§ 22-18-104.
Filling vacancy of congressman; procedure.

The governor shall call such special election by issuing a writ of election to the county clerk of each county voting for the office and to the secretary of state. The writ shall specify the day of the election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-258; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-18-105.
Filling vacancy of congressman; whether filled at general or special election.

If the vacancy in the office of representative in congress occurs within six (6) months prior to the next general election, the vacancy shall be filled at the general election. Otherwise the special election shall occur on the Tuesday following the eighty-ninth day after the vacancy occurs, unless that Tuesday falls on a full legal holiday in which case the election shall occur on the next Tuesday which is not a full legal holiday. The governor shall declare the vacancy and issue the writ of election within five (5) days after the vacancy occurs.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-259; 2013 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 8, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “fifty-five (55)” for “forty (40)” in the second sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “on the Tuesday following the eighty-ninth day” for “not more than fifty-five (55) days” and added “unless that Tuesday falls on a full legal holiday in which case the election shall occur on the next Tuesday which is not a full legal holiday”.

Object and purpose of section. —

See In re Romer, 436 P.2d 956,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1968).

§ 22-18-106.
Filling vacancy of congressman; nominations by state central committees; independent candidates.

An elector qualified to hold the office of representative in congress shall be nominated by the state central committee of the respective parties to fill a vacancy for the unexpired term of that office. Nominations from such parties shall be filed with the secretary of state and fees paid within seven (7) days after the vacancy is officially declared. Independent candidates shall file an application and pay the filing fee with the secretary of state within seven (7) days after the vacancy is officially declared.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-260; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 8, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “seven (7) days” for “fifteen (15) days” in two places.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

As to amount of fees, see §

22-5-208

.

§ 22-18-107.
Filling vacancy of congressman; certification of candidates.

Within five (5) days after the end of the candidate filing period, the secretary of state shall certify to the clerks of counties voting to fill the vacancy the name of each candidate qualified to appear on the ballot, and his party affiliation or independent status.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-261; 2015 ch. 8, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “five (5) days” for “twenty (20) days”, “end of the candidate filing period” for “vacancy is declared,” and “independent status” for “the name of a group or organization sponsoring an independent candidate”

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-18-108.
Filling vacancy of congressman; party requirements.

A candidate for the unexpired term of the office of representative in congress may seek election only as a candidate of the political party in which he was registered on the date the vacancy occurred. A candidate for the unexpired term of office of representative in congress who was not registered with a party on the date the vacancy occurred may run only as an independent.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-262; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-18-109.
Conduct of special election; preparation of ballot.

A special election to fill a vacancy shall be conducted by the county clerk as nearly as possible in the manner of a general election. The county clerk shall have twelve (12) days to prepare the special election ballot after the secretary of state’s certification under W.S.

22-18-107

. The candidate who receives a plurality of the votes at a special election shall be issued a certificate of election as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-263; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 2015 ch. 8, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

added the second sentence.

§ 22-18-110.
Supreme court justices and district court judges.

A vacancy in the office of justice of the supreme court or judge of any district court shall be filled by a qualified person appointed by the governor under section 4, of article 5 of the constitution of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-264.

§ 22-18-111.
Vacancies in other offices; temporary appointments.

Any vacancy in any other elective office in the state except representative in congress or the board of trustees of a school or community college district, shall be filled by the governing body, or as otherwise provided in this section, by appointment of a temporary successor. The person appointed shall serve until a successor for the remainder of the unexpired term is elected at the next general election and takes office on the first Monday of the following January. Provided, if a vacancy in a four (4) year term of office occurs in the term’s second or subsequent years after the first day for filing an application for nomination pursuant to W.S.

22-5-209

, no election to fill the vacancy shall be held and the temporary successor appointed shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term. The following apply:

If a vacancy occurs in the office of United States senator or in any state office other than the governor, member of the state legislature, the office of justice of the supreme court and the office of district court judge, the governor shall immediately notify in writing the chairman of the state central committee of the political party which the last incumbent represented at the time of his election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time of his appointment if not elected to office. The chairman shall call a meeting of the state central committee to be held not later than fifteen (15) days after he receives notice of the vacancy. At the meeting the state central committee shall select and transmit to the governor the names of three (3) persons qualified to hold the office. Within five (5) days after receiving these three (3) names, the governor shall fill the vacancy by temporary appointment of one (1) of the three (3) to hold the office. If the incumbent who has vacated office did not represent a political party at the time of his election, or at the time of his appointment if not elected to office, the governor shall notify in writing the chairman of all state central committees of parties registered with the secretary of state. The state central committees shall submit to the governor, within fifteen (15) days after notice of the vacancy, the name of one (1) person qualified to hold the office. The governor shall also cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the state notice of the vacancy in office. Persons qualified to hold the office who do not belong to a party may, within fifteen (15) days after publication of the vacancy in office, submit a petition signed by one hundred (100) registered voters, seeking consideration for appointment to the office. Within five (5) days after receiving the names of persons qualified to hold the office, the governor shall fill the vacancy by temporary appointment to the office, from the names submitted or from those petitioning for appointment;

If a vacancy occurs in a county elective office, except as provided in W.S.

18-3-524

, the board of county commissioners of the county in which the vacancy occurs shall immediately notify in writing the chairman of the county central committee of the political party which the last incumbent represented at the time of his election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time of his appointment if not elected to office. The chairman shall call a meeting of the county central committee to be held not later than fifteen (15) days after he receives notice of the vacancy. At the meeting the county central committee shall select and transmit to the board of county commissioners the names of three (3) persons qualified to hold the office. Within five (5) days after receiving these three (3) names, the board of county commissioners shall fill the vacancy by appointment of one (1) of the three (3) to hold the office. If the incumbent who has vacated office did not represent a political party at the time of his election, or at the time of his appointment if not elected to office, the county commissioners shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, notice that within fifteen (15) days after publication any person qualified to hold the office may make application directly to the county commissioners for appointment to fill the vacancy. Within twenty (20) days after the publication of the vacancy in office the county commissioners shall fill the vacancy by appointment of one (1) person qualified to hold the office from those submitting applications;

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a member of the state legislature:

For vacancies other than resignations, the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which the vacancy occurs shall immediately notify in writing the chairman of the state central committee of the political party which the former incumbent represented at the time of his election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time of his appointment if not elected to office. For resignations, the governor shall notify the appropriate state central committee or the appropriate board of county commissioners in accordance with W.S.

28-1-106

. For all vacancies in which the incumbent represented a political party at the time of his election or appointment to the office, the state central committee of the political party of the former incumbent shall notify the precinct committeemen and committeewomen for that party for each precinct within the legislative district which is vacant and arrange a meeting of those precinct committeemen and committeewomen at which they will select a list of three (3) persons qualified to hold the office to fill the vacancy. Only those persons serving as committeemen and committeewomen at least thirty (30) days prior to the vacancy, or if the vacancy occurs within thirty (30) days after the first Monday in January in odd-numbered years, those precinct committeemen and committeewomen elected at the immediate past primary election and those selected by appointment prior to December 2 of the year in which the election occurred for vacant positions, shall be authorized to vote under this subparagraph. The meeting shall be held not later than fifteen (15) days after the state central committee is notified of the vacancy. The state central committee of each political party shall establish procedures for conducting the vote required under this subparagraph and may delegate the authority to call the meeting required under this subparagraph;

The state central committee of the political party of the former incumbent shall submit the list selected under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph to the board of county commissioners for each county in which the legislative district is located. Within five (5) days after receiving the list of three (3) names, the board of county commissioners shall fill the vacancy by appointment of one (1) of the three (3) to hold the office;

If the incumbent who has vacated office did not represent a political party at the time of his election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time of his appointment if not elected to office, the county commissioners shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of this subparagraph. The county commissioners shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, notice that within fifteen (15) days after publication, any person qualified to hold the office may make application directly to the county commissioners for appointment to fill the vacancy. Within twenty (20) days after publication of the notice of the vacancy in office, the county commissioners shall fill the vacancy by appointing one (1) person qualified to hold the office from among those submitting applications;

If the legislative district is in more than one (1) county, the vacancy shall be filled by the combined vote of the boards of county commissioners for those counties. The vote of each county commissioner in attendance shall be weighted so that the total vote of the commissioners from each county shall be in proportion to the population of the legislative district within that county. For vacancies created other than by resignation, if the legislative district is in more than one (1) county, the determination of the vacancy shall be made in accordance with this subparagraph.

A vacancy in the office of any hospital district trustee or in any other special district office shall be filled by temporary appointment by the governing body of the hospital or special district, both subject to chapter 29 of this title;

A vacancy in a municipal office shall be filled as provided by W.S.

15-1-107

;

If the county commissioners fail to fill any vacancy as required in this section within the time specified, any person residing in the county or legislative district who is qualified to hold the office may file a petition with the clerk of the district court of the county or legislative district in which the vacancy occurred requesting the judge of the district court to fill the vacancy. Within thirty (30) days after the petition is filed the judge shall fill the vacancy by appointing a person residing in the county or legislative district belonging to the same political party as the incumbent represented at the time of his election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time of his appointment if not elected to office, who is qualified to hold the office. If the incumbent did not represent any political party at the time of his election or at the time of his appointment if not elected to office, the judge may appoint any person residing in the county or legislative district who is qualified to hold the office to fill the vacancy.

The trustees of a school or community college district shall fill a vacancy in office by temporary appointment in a manner provided by law. If the trustees fail to appoint a person qualified to hold the office to fill a vacancy within thirty (30) days from the date the vacancy occurs, or if, for any reason, the entire membership of the board of trustees of a school or community college district is depleted, the board of county commissioners of the county or counties involved, within ten (10) days of either occurrence, shall appoint a person qualified to hold the office to fill each vacancy until the next election at which time an election shall be held to fill the unexpired term, and each appointee shall serve until his successor is elected and qualified. Each appointee shall be a resident of the trustee residence area, or election subdistrict, if any, previously represented.

For purposes of this section:

A person shall be considered to represent a political party if he was a nominee of that political party when elected to office or when appointed to fill a vacancy in office;

“Qualified to hold the office” means a person meets all applicable qualifications to be elected to a public office which are set forth in the United States and Wyoming constitutions and Wyoming law, as applicable, on the date of the person’s appointment to the public office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-265; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1979, ch. 3, § 1; ch. 53, § 1; 1981, ch. 159, § 1; 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1992, ch. 1, § 6; 1993, ch. 91, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2004, ch. 22, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1; 2011, ch. 38, § 1; 2013 ch. 159, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; ; 2015, ch. 154, § 1; 2015 ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 118, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

As to state committeeman or committeewoman, see §

22-4-112

.

As to nominations for elective office, see §

22-5-401

.

As to judges of elections and members of counting boards, see §

22-8-112

.

As to congressional representative, see §

22-18-103

.

As to filling vacancies in the office of justice of the supreme court or judge of district court, see §

22-18-110

.

As to filling vacancies in nomination for presidential elector, see §

22-19-105

.

As to filling vacancies in office of presidential elector, see §

22-19-106

.

For provision concerning filling of vacancies in school or community college districts, see §

22-22-102

.

As to filling vacancies in office of county commissioners, see §

18-3-524

.

The 2004 amendment

rewrote (a), substituting provisions pertaining to a person representing a political party rather than belonging to a political party, and modifying timing and notice requirements; and added (c).

Laws 2004, ch. 22, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2004.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “title” for “act” in (a)(iv).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(iii)(D), deleted “according to the most recent decennial census” from the end of the second to last sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “The person appointed shall,” “Provided,” “in the term's second or subsequent years,” and “election to fill the vacancy shall be held and,” and substituted “the remainder of the unexpired term” for “until the first Monday in January following the second general election thereafter.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “or if the vacancy occurs within thirty (30) days after a primary election, including precinct committeemen and committeewomen elected at that primary” in (a)(iii)(A).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(iii)(A), substituted “the first Monday in January in odd-numbered years, those precinct committeemen and committeewomen elected at the immediate past primary election and those selected by appointment prior to December 2 of the year in which the election occurred for vacant positions” for “a primary election, including precinct committeemen and committeewomen elected at that primary” in the fourth sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

in (a)(i), in the first sentence, inserted “governor, member of the state legislature, the,” in the third and sixth sentences, substituted “hold the office” for “fill the vacancy,” and in the next-to-last and last sentences, substituted “Persons qualified to hold the office” for “Qualified persons”; in (a)(ii), in the third sentence, substituted “hold the office” for “fill the vacancy,” in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “person qualified to hold the office” for “qualified person,” and in the last sentence inserted “to hold the office” following “person qualified,” in (a)(iii)(A), at the end of the third sentence, substituted “to hold the office” for “to fill the vacancy,” in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “person qualified to hold the office” for “qualified person” preceding “may,” and, in the last sentence, inserted “to hold the office” following “qualified”; in (a)(iii)(C), in the second sentence, substituted “person qualified to hold the office” for “qualified person” preceding “may,” and in the last sentence substituted “appointing one (1) person qualified to hold the office from among” for “appointment of one (1) person qualified from” preceding “those submitting applications,” in (a)(vi), inserted “who is qualified to hold the office” wherever it appears, in the first sentence, substituted “person residing in the county or legislative district” for “qualified elector of the county” and inserted “or legislative district” preceding “in which,” in the second sentence, substituted “person residing in the county or legislative district” for qualified elector of the county” and inserted “ or legislative district” preceding “belonging,” and in the last sentence, substituted “person residing in the county or legislative district” for “any qualified elector of”; in (b), twice substituted “person qualified to hold the office” for “qualified person” following “appoint a”; added (c)(ii); redesignated the existing language in (c) as the present introductory language and (c)(i), and made a stylistic change in present (c)(i).

Laws 2018, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

The word “title” was inserted in brackets following “this act” in subsection (a)(iv) as “this title” appears to be the intended reference.

Laws 2009 ch 170 § 3 provides:

“(a) No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b) No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

General election. —

A person elected to fill a vacancy in the office of governor on Tuesday next after the first Monday of November, 1892, was elected at a general election. In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1893).

Length of term. —

Where a person appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of state treasurer was afterward elected to the office at a general election held before the term of his predecessor would have expired, he was not entitled to hold the office for four years after such general election, but only for the remainder of his predecessor's term. State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1906).

Nomination by state central committee. —

Statutes held not to authorize state central committee to nominate candidate for office of secretary of state to fill unexpired term of one who died 26 days before general election date. State ex rel. Copenhaver v. Jack, 60 Wyo. 405, 153 P.2d 149,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1944).

§ 22-18-112.
Certificate of appointment.

The officer or governmental body filling a vacancy by temporary appointment shall issue a “Certificate of Appointment” to the person filling the vacancy. The certificate shall be lawful authority to hold the office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-266.